West Virginia, session 2026, HB5136.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. LICENSING OF DEALERS AND WRECKERS OR DISMANTLERS; SPECIAL PLATES; TEMPORARY PLATES OR MARKERS. §17A-6-1c. Authorizing manufacturer direct sales of motor vehicles. Notwithstanding any other code provision to the contrary, a manufacturer may be licensed and operate as a new motor vehicle dealer in this state if the manufacturer:(1) Has been manufacturing zero emissions motor vehicles since at least 2008;(2) Manufactures or assembles zero emissions motor vehicles exclusively and has never sold its line make of motor vehicles in this state through a franchised new motor vehicle dealer; and(3) Has not acquired a controlling interest in a franchisor or a subsidiary or other entity controlled by a franchisor, or sold or transferred a controlling interest in such manufacturer to a franchisor or subsidiary or other entity controlled by such franchisor.